Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-3437.02
Coordinating professional; designation; duties.

(1) Projects involving more than one licensed architect or professional engineer shall have an architect or professional engineer designated as the coordinating professional for the entire project. The coordinating professional may, but need not, provide architectural or engineering services on the project. The coordinating professional shall apply his or her seal in accordance with the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act to the cover sheet of all documents and denote the seal as that of the coordinating professional.

(2) The coordinating professional shall be responsible for reviewing and coordinating technical documents prepared by others for compatibility with the design of the project.

Laws 2015, LB23, § 37.